Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Administration — Investments

386.010.
Definitions for KRS 386.010 to 386.175.

As used in KRS

386.010

to

386.175

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Fiduciary” means any trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, conservator or other individual or corporation holding funds or otherwise acting in a fiduciary capacity.

“Principal” means any person to whom a fiduciary, as such, owes an obligation.

History.

4711-1: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 99, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 152, effective July 13, 1984; 2014, ch. 25, § 100, effective July 15, 2014.

386.020.
Authorized investments of trust funds — Fiduciary to account for profits — Section not applicable to trustees.

Any fiduciary holding funds for loan or investment may invest them in:

Bonds or other interest-bearing obligations of the federal government;

Bonds, state warrants, and other interest-bearing obligations of this state;

Obligations issued separately or collectively by or for federal land banks, federal intermediate credit banks, and banks for cooperatives under the Act of Congress known as the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 85 Stat. 583, 12

U.S.C. sec. 2001

and amendments thereto;

Notes and bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured by the federal housing administrator, obligations issued or insured by the federal housing administrator, and securities issued by national mortgage associations;

Obligations representing loans and advances of credit that are eligible for credit insurance by the federal housing administrator, and the fiduciary may obtain such insurance;

Loans secured by real property or leasehold, that the federal housing administrator insures or makes a commitment to insure, and the fiduciary may obtain such insurance;

Real estate mortgage notes, bonds, and other interest-bearing or dividend-paying securities, including securities of any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 or units of common trust funds managed by the fiduciary, which would be regarded by prudent businessmen as a safe investment. The fact that the fiduciary is providing services to the foregoing investment company or trust as investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, or otherwise shall not preclude the fiduciary from investing in the securities of such investment or trust;

Real estate, after obtaining the approval of the District Court for such investment;

Life insurance, endowment, and annuity contracts issued by legal reserve companies authorized to do business in this state, after obtaining the approval of the District Court for such investment. Said fiduciary may select any optional settlement provided in a policy maturing by death or as an endowment;

Notes, other interest-bearing obligations, and purchases of participations in such instruments, that are guaranteed in whole or in part by the United States of America or by any agency or instrumentality thereof;

Certificates of deposit and savings accounts of any state or national bank whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and whose main office is in this state, including itself, if such fiduciary is a bank. Any portion of such investments that is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be fully secured by:

An irrevocable letter of credit issued by the United States of America or by an agency or instrumentality thereof;

A pledge of securities named in this subsection as collateral;

A surety bond; or

A combination of such irrevocable letters of credit, securities, and surety bonds; and

United States government securities or United States government agency securities, the payment of the principal and interest on which the full faith and credit of the United States is pledged, said investments being made under the terms of a repurchase agreement between the fiduciary and any state or national bank whose main office is in this state, including itself, if such fiduciary is a bank.

Fiduciaries holding funds for loan or investment may make loans with the securities named in subsection (1) of this section as collateral.

The fiduciary shall account for all interest or profit received.

This section shall not apply to trustees.

History.

4706, 4706a, 4706-6, 4706-7: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 111; 1950, ch. 171; 1954, ch. 52; 1960, ch. 155; 1962, ch. 133; 1970, ch. 267, § 1; 1976, ch. 107, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 325, effective January 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 134, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 391, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 450, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 157, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 25, § 101, effective July 15, 2014.

386.023.
Investment method alternatives.

Any other provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, and in the absence of an express provision to the contrary in an instrument establishing a fiduciary relationship, whenever such instrument requires, directs, authorizes, or permits a fiduciary to invest funds in obligations of the United States government or in obligations unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government, such fiduciary may invest in and hold such obligations either directly or in the form of securities in any open-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as from time to time amended, provided that the portfolio of such investment company or investment trust is limited to such obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by obligations of the United States government or obligations unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government and provided further that any such investment company or investment trust shall take delivery of such collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

386.025.
Restrictions on investment in own stock by bank or trust company acting as fiduciary.

No bank or trust company empowered to act as a fiduciary under the laws of this state, shall purchase shares of its own capital stock or shares of the capital stock of an affiliated institution as an investment for any estate or trust under its management, unless expressly authorized so to do by the instrument creating the estate or trust, or unless acquired through the exercise of rights issued in respect to stock originally received; provided however, if shares of its own capital stock or shares of the capital stock of an affiliated institution are received by any such bank or trust company direct from the testator or donor, as an original investment in an estate or trust, the fact that they are shares in the fiduciary institution, or an affiliate thereof, shall not, of itself, be sufficient to cause them to be considered improper investments, regardless of the number of said shares or value thereof, but said shares together with any additional shares subsequently acquired through the exercise of rights issued in respect thereto shall be regarded as proper trust investments in the hands of such fiduciary bank or trust company, if they would be so regarded if held by an individual acting in such fiduciary capacity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 13.

386.030.
Investment of funds of financial institutions and funds in hands of public officials.

Banks, trust companies, insurance companies, savings and loan associations, executors, administrators, trustees or others acting in a fiduciary capacity, trust funds, and other financial institutions, originating mortgagee institutions, and other institutions approved as mortgagees and meeting otherwise the requirements of the secretary of housing and urban development, the Federal Housing Administration or Department of Veterans Affairs to act as mortgagees under that agency’s approval program, subject to the laws of this state, may:

Make such loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit as are eligible for credit insurance or guaranty by the secretary of housing and urban development, the federal housing administrator or administrator of veterans’ affairs, and may obtain such insurance, guaranty or other approval;

Make such loans secured by real property or leasehold, as the secretary of housing and urban development, the federal housing administrator or administrator of veterans’ affairs insures or issues a guaranty or makes a commitment to insure, or guaranty, and may obtain such insurance, or guaranty;

Invest their funds, eligible for investment, in notes or bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured by the secretary of housing and urban development, the federal housing administrator or administrator of veterans’ affairs, and in debentures issued by the secretary of housing and urban development, the federal housing administrator or administrator of veterans’ affairs, and also in securities issued by national mortgage associations; and

Invest their funds in real estate mortgage notes, bonds and other interest-bearing or dividend-paying securities (including securities of any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940) which would be regarded by prudent businessmen as a safe investment. The fact that the persons listed in this subsection are providing services to the foregoing investment company or trust as investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar or otherwise shall not preclude such persons from investing in the securities of such investment company or trust.

This state and any of its political subdivisions, or any agency or instrumentality thereof may invest its funds and the moneys in its custody or possession, eligible for investment, in notes or bonds described in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section.

No law of this state requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing the nature, amount or form of the security, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or investments, or limiting investments of capital or deposits, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, shall apply to loans or investments made pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

4706-6, 4706-7, 4706-9: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 163, § 1; 1968, ch. 152, § 159; 1970, ch. 205, § 1; 1972, ch. 327, § 1; 1984, ch. 408, § 66, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 391, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2017 ch. 42, § 19, effective June 29, 2017.

386.040.
Securities of certain federal agencies authorized as collateral.

Notes or bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured and debentures issued by the Federal Housing Administrator, debentures issued by national mortgage associations, and any electric revenue bonds or other obligations issued by the Tennessee Valley Authority, are eligible securities for the purpose, wherever the statutes of this state require, of:

Collateral as security for the deposit of public or other funds;

Deposits to be made with any public official or department;

Investment of capital or surplus; or

A reserve or other fund to be maintained consisting of designated securities.

History.

4706-8: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 188, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county could invest in any Federal National Mortgage Association notes or debentures which fall within the category described in this section.

OAG 79-317

.

386.050.
Housing authority obligations — Authorized investments — Security for public deposits — Negotiable — United States bonds.

This state and all public officers, cities, political subdivisions and public bodies, all banks, trust companies, savings institutions, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, and other persons carrying on an insurance business and all fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to the Municipal Housing Authority Act or the Rural Housing Authority Act, and any additional amendments thereto, or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when these bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States or any agency thereof, or in any electric revenue bonds or other obligations issued by the Tennessee Valley Authority.

These bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this state.

Nothing in this section with regard to legal investments shall relieve any individual or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Any county, municipality, or other taxing district may legally invest its sinking funds, money, or other funds belonging to it or within its control in United States Defense Bonds or any other bonds or obligations for the payment of which the faith and credit of the United States Government is pledged.

History.

4706-11: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2; 1960, ch. 188, § 2; 1968, ch. 152, § 160.

386.060.
Investments not to be contrary to instrument creating trust.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to permit a sale, investment or loan in conflict with the provisions of the will, deed or other instrument creating the trust, or under which the funds or property may be held.

History.

4708.

386.070.
Disposition of unauthorized securities. [Repealed]

386.080.
Sale of securities held by fiduciary; protection of purchaser. [Repealed.]

386.090.
Sale of real property held under express trust. [Repealed.]

386.093.
Effect of disability, incapacity, or death on power of attorney, durable or otherwise. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 1; 1998, ch. 421, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2018 ch. 185, § 30, effective July 14, 2018.

386.095.
Execution and delivery of releases of powers exercisable by deed, will or otherwise. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 14; 1984, ch. 111, § 196, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2020 ch. 41, § 40, effective July 15, 2020.

386.100.
Application of payments made to a fiduciary — Section not applicable to trustees.

Any person who in good faith pays or transfers to a fiduciary any money or other property which the fiduciary as such is authorized to receive shall not be responsible for the proper application thereof by the fiduciary, and any right or title acquired from the fiduciary in consideration of the payment or transfer shall not be invalid because of a misapplication by the fiduciary.

This section shall not apply to trustees.

History.

4711-2; 2014, ch. 25, § 102, effective July 15, 2014.

386.110.
Transfer of a negotiable instrument by a fiduciary.

If any negotiable instrument payable or endorsed to a fiduciary as such is endorsed by the fiduciary, or if any negotiable instrument payable or endorsed to his principal is endorsed by a fiduciary empowered to endorse the instrument on behalf of his principal, the endorsee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in endorsing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary, unless he takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach or with knowledge of such facts that his action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith.

History.

4711-3.

386.120.
Deposits in fiduciary’s personal account.

If a fiduciary makes a deposit in a bank or trust company to his personal credit of checks drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, or of checks payable to him as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal if he is empowered to draw checks thereon, or of checks payable to his principal and endorsed by him if he is empowered to endorse them, or if he otherwise makes a deposit of funds held by him as fiduciary, the bank or trust company receiving the deposit is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary. The bank or trust company may pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the personal check of the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless it receives the deposit or pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in making the deposit or in drawing the check or with knowledge of such facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check amounts to bad faith.

History.

4711-8.

386.130.
Deposits in name of fiduciary as such — In name of principal.

If a deposit is made in a bank or trust company to the credit of a fiduciary as such, the bank or trust company may pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the check of the fiduciary, signed with the name in which the deposit is entered, without being liable to the principal, unless it pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check or with knowledge of such facts that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith.

If a check is drawn upon the account of his principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw checks upon his principal’s account, the bank or trust company may pay the check without being liable to the principal, unless it pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check or with knowledge of such facts that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith.

History.

4711-6, 4711-7.

386.140.
Checks drawn by a fiduciary payable to third person or to himself.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary as such, or in the name of his principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw the instrument in the name of his principal, the payee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary, unless he takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach or with knowledge of such facts that his action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary as such or in the name of his principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw the instrument in the name of his principal, payable to the fiduciary personally, or payable to a third person and by him transferred to the fiduciary, and is thereafter transferred by the fiduciary, whether in payment of a personal debt of the fiduciary or otherwise, the transferee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary in transferring the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary unless he takes the instrument with actual knowledge of the breach or with knowledge of such facts that his action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith.

History.

4711-4, 4711-5.

386.150.
Fiduciary not relieved of liability.

KRS

386.100

to

386.140

do not in any way relieve a fiduciary who breaches his trust and causes any loss thereby of his liability under his bond, or of any civil or criminal liability provided for by law.

History.

4711-9.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bond of fiduciary, provisions for, KRS

62.060

.

Contribution among persons in trust or official capacity,
KRS

412.050

.

386.160.
Deposit of funds with joint control by surety and fiduciary.

Any fiduciary of whom a bond, undertaking or other obligation is required may agree with his surety for the deposit and safekeeping of any moneys and assets for which he and his surety may be held responsible, with a bank, safe deposit or trust company, authorized by law to do business in this state as such, or with another depository in this state approved by the court, if the depository is otherwise proper. The agreement and the deposit shall be made so as to prevent the withdrawal of the deposit or any part thereof without the written consent of the surety, or an order of court, made on such notice to the surety as the court may direct. However, the agreement shall not in any manner release from or change the liability of the principal or surety as established by the terms of the bond.

History.

4671a: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 326, effective January 2, 1978.

386.165.
Deposit of securities in a clearing corporation — Accounting and crediting of deposits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any fiduciary holding securities in its fiduciary capacity, any bank or trust company holding securities as a custodian or managing agent, any bank or trust company holding securities as custodian for a fiduciary, is authorized to deposit or arrange for the deposit of such securities in a clearing corporation as defined in KRS

355.8-102

. When such securities are so deposited, certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issuer may be merged and held in bulk in the name of the nominee of such clearing corporation with any other such securities deposited in such clearing corporation by any person regardless of the ownership of such securities, and certificates of small denomination may be merged into one (1) or more certificates of larger denomination. The records of such fiduciary and the records of such bank or trust company acting as custodian, as managing agent or as custodian for a fiduciary shall at all times show the name of the party for whose account the securities are so deposited. Title to such securities may be transferred by bookkeeping entry on the books of such clearing corporation without physical delivery or certificates representing such securities. A bank or trust company depositing securities pursuant to this section shall be subject to such rules and regulations with respect to the making and maintenance of such deposit as, in the case of a bank or trust company organized under the laws of this state, the executive director of financial institutions and, in the case of national banking associations, the comptroller of the currency may from time to time issue. A bank or trust company acting as custodian for a fiduciary shall, on demand of the fiduciary, certify in writing to the fiduciary the securities so deposited by such bank or trust company in such clearing corporation for the account of such fiduciary. A fiduciary shall, on demand by any party to its accounting or on demand by the attorney for such party, certify in writing to such party the securities deposited by such fiduciary in such clearing corporation for its account as such fiduciary.

This section shall apply to any fiduciary holding securities in a fiduciary capacity, and to any bank or trust company holding securities as a custodian, managing agent or custodian for a fiduciary, acting on June 21, 1974, or who thereafter may act regardless of the date of the agreement, instrument or court order by which it is appointed and regardless of whether or not such fiduciary, custodian, managing agent or custodian for a fiduciary owns capital stock of such clearing corporation.

As used in this section, “fiduciary” includes an executor, administrator, trustee under any trust, express, implied, resulting or constructive, guardian, conservator, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, agent, officer of a corporation, public or private, public officer or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust or estate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 194, § 1; 1982, ch. 141, § 100, effective July 1, 1982.

386.170.
Nonresident trustee for personal property of nonresident beneficiary — Power to act in this state.

Where the beneficial owner of personal estate, held and controlled for his benefit or the benefit of his children or heirs by a trustee, is a nonresident of this state and has no trustee in this state, his trustee, appointed and qualified according to the laws of the place where the person resides, may collect, receive and remove to such place of residence any personal estate of the person or cestui que trust located in this state.

Upon application by petition in a summary way, the Circuit Court having jurisdiction may authorize the foreign trustee to sue for, recover and remove any such personal estate of the nonresident cestui que trust, or to otherwise act as a trustee appointed in this state.

The court shall not grant the petition or authorize the collection or removal of such property unless it is satisfied by documentary evidence that the foreign trustee has, where he qualified, given bond with good and sufficient surety to account for all the estate of the nonresident cestui que trust that might come to his hands, nor unless the court is satisfied that neither the nonresident cestui que trust nor any person having a present, future or contingent interest in the personal estate will be prejudiced by the order.

The venue for such action shall lie in the county where there is jurisdiction in the District Court to appoint a trustee for the nonresident person.

History.

4709 to 4711: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.

386.175.
Trustee’s power to appoint principal or income in favor of trustee of
second trust — Terms of second trust — Special fiduciary — Notice — Judicial
proceedings.

For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Current beneficiary” means a person who is a permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

“Original trust” means a trust established under an irrevocable trust instrument pursuant to the terms of which a trustee has discretionary power to distribute principal or income of the trust to or for the benefit of one (1) or more current beneficiaries of the trust; and

“Second trust” means a trust established under an irrevocable trust instrument, the current beneficiaries of which are one (1) or more of the current beneficiaries of the original trust. The second trust may be a trust created under the same trust instrument as the original trust or under a different trust instrument or the original trust whose terms have been modified under this section.

A trustee of an original trust may, without authorization by the court, exercise the discretionary power to distribute principal or income to or for the benefit of one (1) or more current beneficiaries of the original trust by appointing all or part of the principal or income of the original trust subject to the power in favor of the trustee of a second trust or by modifying the terms of the original trust. The trustee of the original trust may exercise this power whether or not there is a current need to distribute principal or income under any standard provided in the terms of the original trust. The trustee’s special power to appoint trust principal or income in further trust under this section includes the power to create the second trust.

The second trust may be a trust created or administered under the laws of any jurisdiction, within or without the United States.

The terms of the second trust shall be subject to all of the following:

The beneficiaries of the second trust may include only beneficiaries of the original trust;

A beneficiary who has only a future beneficial interest, vested or contingent, in the original trust cannot have the future beneficial interest accelerated to a present interest in the second trust;

The terms of the second trust may not reduce any fixed income, annuity, or unitrust interest of a beneficiary in the assets of the original trust, including an interest which is to take effect in the future;

If any contribution to the original trust qualified for a marital or charitable deduction for federal income, gift, or estate tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code, then the second trust shall not contain any provision that, if included in the original trust, would have prevented the original trust from qualifying for the deduction or that would have reduced the amount of the deduction;

If contributions to the original trust have been excluded from the gift tax by the application of Sections 2503(b) and 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, then the second trust shall provide that the beneficiary’s remainder interest in the contributions shall vest and become distributable no later than the date upon which the interest would have vested and become distributable under the terms of the original trust;

If any beneficiary of the original trust has a currently exercisable power of withdrawal over trust property, then either:

The terms of the second trust shall provide a power of withdrawal in the second trust identical to the power of withdrawal in the original trust; or

Sufficient trust property shall remain in the original trust to satisfy the currently exercisable power of withdrawal;

If the original trust holds stock of an S corporation, the terms of the second trust shall not prevent or eliminate an election to be a qualified subchapter S trust or an electing small business trust or result in the termination of the S election of such corporation;

If the power to distribute principal or income in the original trust is subject to an ascertainable standard, then the power to distribute income or principal in the second trust shall be subject to the same or a more restrictive ascertainable standard as in the original trust when the trustee exercising the power described in subsection (2) of this section is a possible beneficiary under the standard; and

The second trust may confer a power of appointment upon a beneficiary of the original trust to whom or for the benefit of whom the trustee has the power to distribute principal or income of the original trust. The permissible appointees of the power of appointment conferred upon a beneficiary may include persons who are not beneficiaries of the original or second trust. The power of appointment conferred upon a beneficiary shall be subject to KRS

381.224

,

381.225

, and

381.226

covering the time at which the permissible period of the rule against perpetuities and suspension of power of alienation begins and the law that determines the permissible period of the rule against perpetuities and suspension of power of alienation of the original trust.

The court may appoint a special fiduciary with the authority to exercise the power to appoint principal or income under subsection (2) of this section.

The exercise of the power to appoint principal or income under subsection (2) of this section:

Shall be considered an exercise of a power of appointment, other than a power to appoint to the trustee, the trustee’s creditors, the trustee’s estate, or the creditors of the trustee’s estate;

Shall be subject to KRS

381.224

,

381.225

, and

381.226

covering the time at which the permissible period of the rule against perpetuities and suspension of power of alienation begins and the law that determines the permissible period of the rule against perpetuities and suspension of power of alienation of the original trust; and

Is not prohibited by a spendthrift provision or by a provision in the original trust instrument that prohibits amendment or revocation of the trust.

To effect the exercise of the power to appoint principal or income under subsection (2) of this section, all of the following shall apply:

The exercise of the power to appoint shall be made by an instrument in writing, signed and acknowledged by the trustee, setting forth the manner of the exercise of the power, including the terms of the second trust and the effective date of the exercise of the power. The instrument shall be filed with the records of the original trust;

The trustee shall give written notice of the trustee’s intention to exercise the power to all current beneficiaries of the original trust and all beneficiaries of the oldest generation of remainder beneficiaries of the original trust, by certified mail with restricted delivery and return receipt, at least sixty (60) days prior to the effective date of the exercise of the power to appoint. The notice shall include a copy of the instrument described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

If all beneficiaries entitled to notice have received the notice as evidenced by the certified mail return receipt and waive the notice period by a signed written instrument delivered to the trustee, the trustee’s power to appoint principal or income shall be exercisable after notice is waived by all such beneficiaries, notwithstanding the effective date of the exercise of the power;

A current beneficiary or a beneficiary who is not a current beneficiary but is a member of the oldest generation of the remainder beneficiaries of the original trust may, no later than thirty (30) days from the date of receiving notice under paragraph (b) of this subsection, commence a judicial proceeding pursuant to KRS

386B.2-010

to object to the proposed exercise of the power under subsection (2) of this section. In such case the proposed exercise of the power shall require consent of the court; and

In the event that a beneficiary did not receive the notice as evidenced by the certified mail return receipt, and no other beneficiary has commenced a proceeding under paragraph (d) of this subsection, the trustee may seek the approval of the District Court to exercise the power.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create or imply a duty of the trustee to exercise the power to distribute principal or income, and no inference of impropriety shall be made as a result of a trustee not exercising the power to appoint principal or income conferred under subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to abridge the right of any trustee who has the power to appoint property in further trust that arises under the terms of the original trust or under any provision of law or under common law.

This section shall not apply to any charitable remainder trust as defined in 26

U.S.C. sec. 664(d)

.

A trustee or beneficiary may commence a judicial proceeding pursuant to KRS

386B.2-010

to approve or disapprove of a proposed exercise of the trustee’s special power to appoint to a second trust pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 59, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 25, § 103, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 25, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

386.180.
Compensation of trustees of estates. [Repealed.]

386.185.
Distribution of trusts of $50,000 or less. [Repealed.]